West Virginia, session 2025, SB402.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Real Estate Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 9, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-24 of this code, relating to the Real Estate Commission (consideration of prior criminal convictions in initial license eligibility determination, 174 CSR 07), is authorized.